California statutes. Education Code
For the purposes of educational programs sponsored by the California Firefighter Joint Apprenticeship Program, the term “immediate supervision” as used in Section 46300 means, in the context of classes conducted at the workplace, pupil participation in classes instructed by a person who is qualified, by means of education or experience, as a journeyman, and shares the responsibility for supervision of the pupils participating in the classes with certificated personnel of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1355, Sec. 20.)
-------------------------------------------

46300.6.

The State Department of Education shall not apportion funds to a local education agency for a pupil in the independent study program if that agency has provided any funds or other things of value to the pupil or his or her parent or guardian that the agency does not provide to pupils who attend regular classes or to their parents or guardians.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 66, Sec. 28.   Effective June 30, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

46300.7.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, no school district or county office of education shall receive apportionments for any pupil in independent study unless that entity receives written permission from the parent or guardian of the pupil prior to the commencement of independent study by that pupil. The written permission shall specify the actual dates of participation, the methods of study and evaluation, and the resources to be made available for the independent study program for the pupil.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 66, Sec. 29.   Effective June 30, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

46301.

Whenever it is necessary to compute the average daily attendance of a school of a district for any certain purpose and no provision is made for the computation thereof for such purpose, the average daily attendance of the school shall be computed by dividing the total number of days of pupil attendance allowed by the number of days school was actually taught in the regular day schools of the district, exclusive of Saturdays or Sundays.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

46302.

Where in a high school or elementary school four terms of school of at least 12 weeks each are maintained during a fiscal year, and where the course of instruction is so arranged that students may complete a full year’s work in any three terms, the total number of days of pupils attendance shall be divided by the greatest number of days school was actually taught in any three of the four terms, but in no case shall the divisor be less than 175.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

46303.

(a) If any computation of average daily attendance made under, or necessitated by, any provision of law, results in a fraction of less than one-half of a unit, the average daily attendance shall be taken as the next lowest whole number, except that if such computation results in an average daily attendance of less than one unit, the average daily attendance shall be deemed to be one unit; but if the fraction is one-half or more of a unit, the average daily attendance shall be taken as the next highest whole number.

(b) Whenever any reference is made to a specific whole number of units of average daily attendance said number shall include any fraction above said number which is less than one-half of a unit, and any fraction of one-half or more of a unit above the next lowest whole number.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

46304.

(a) Notwithstanding anything in this code to the contrary when as a result of the unification or other reorganization of school districts, or the change of school district boundaries, and if the Superintendent of Public Instruction determines that a school district in which pupils reside does not have suitable facilities in which to maintain school for all the day pupils of the district, or that for other good and sufficient reasons the education of pupils in the district in which they reside is not practical or in the best interests of the pupils, the governing board of the district of residence shall contract with the governing board of another school district for the education of those pupils for whom suitable facilities are not available, or who should be educated in another district, as determined by the Superintendent of Public Instruction.

(b) Except as provided in subdivision (b) of Section 46607 and Sections 46610 and 46611, the average daily attendance of pupils attending a district other than the district in which they reside pursuant to a contract described in subdivision (a) shall be credited to the district of attendance for apportionment purposes.

(c) Any reorganization proposal approved by the State Board of Education on or before December 31, 1994, shall be governed by Section 46304 as it existed on December 31, 1994.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1186, Sec. 16.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

46305.

Each elementary, high school, and unified school district shall report to the Superintendent of Public Instruction on forms prepared by the Department of Education in addition to all other attendance data as required, the active enrollment as of the third Wednesday of each school month and the actual attendance on the third Wednesday of each school month; except that if such day is a school holiday, the active enrollment and actual attendance of the first immediate preceding schoolday shall be reported. “Active enrollment” on a day a count is taken means the pupils in enrollment in the regular schooldays of the district on the first day of the school year on which the schools were in session, plus all later enrollees, minus all withdrawals since that day.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

46307.

Attendance of individuals with exceptional needs, identified pursuant to Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 56300) of Part 30, enrolled in a special day class or given instruction individually or in a home, hospital, or licensed children’s institution who attend school for either the same number of minutes that constitutes a minimum schoolday pursuant to Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 46100), or for the number of minutes of attendance specified in that pupil’s individualized education program developed pursuant to Article 3 (commencing with Section 56340) of Chapter 4 of Part 30, whichever is less, shall constitute a day of attendance.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 825, Sec. 19.   Effective October 9, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

46307.1.

The computation of average daily attendance pursuant to this chapter shall not include the attendance of minors between the ages of 18 months and three years, inclusive, enrolled in programs operated by a county superintendent of schools who are physically handicapped, deaf or hard of hearing, or have speech disorders or speech defects.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1452, Sec. 393.5.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. County School Service Fund [46360. - 46360.]

46360.

The average daily attendance of individuals with exceptional needs given instruction by a county superintendent of schools and whose attendance is credited to the county school service fund, shall be computed by dividing the total days of attendance of such pupils during the fiscal year by 175.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1452, Sec. 395.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. County School Tuition Fund [46380. - 46380.]

46380.

The average daily attendance for the fiscal year of pupils residing in a county of this state and attending a school in an adjoining state under Article 1 (commencing with Section 2000) of Chapter 7 of Part 2 of Division 1 of Title 1 shall be reported using the methodology for reporting second principal apportionment attendance as provided in Section 41601.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 32, Sec. 40.   (AB 1808)   Effective June 27, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8. Emergency Average Daily Attendance [46390. - 46393.]

46390.

Where a school in a district maintaining more than one school is closed for a part of a term by order of a city or county board of health or of the State Board of Health, or because of fire, flood, impassable roads, epidemic, or other emergency, or by an order provided for in Section 41422, the average daily attendance of the school shall be estimated separately, as provided in Section 46392, and added to the average daily attendance of the other schools of the district.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

46391.

Whenever any attendance records of any district have been lost or destroyed, making it impossible for an accurate report on average daily attendance for the district for any fiscal year to be rendered, which fact shall be shown to the satisfaction of the Superintendent of Public Instruction by the affidavits of the members of the governing board of the district and the county superintendent of schools, the Superintendent of Public Instruction shall estimate the average daily attendance of such district. The estimated average daily attendance shall be deemed to be the actual average daily attendance for that fiscal year for the making of apportionments to the school district from the State School Fund.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

46392.

(a) If the average daily attendance of a school district, county office of education, or charter school during a fiscal year has been materially decreased during a fiscal year because of any of the following, the fact shall be established to the satisfaction of the Superintendent by affidavits of the members of the governing board or body of the school district, county office of education, or charter school and the county superintendent of schools:

(1) Fire.

(2) Flood.

(3) Impassable roads.

(4) Epidemic.

(5) Earthquake.

(6) The imminence of a major safety hazard as determined by the local law enforcement or fire
 agency.

(7) A strike involving transportation services to pupils provided by a nonschool entity.

(8) An order provided for in Section 41422.

(9) Snowstorm.

(b) (1) In the event a state of emergency is declared by the Governor in a county, a decrease in average daily attendance in the county below the approximate total average daily attendance that would have been credited to a school district, county office of education, or charter school had the state of emergency not occurred shall be deemed material. The Superintendent shall determine the length of the period during which average daily attendance has been reduced by the state of emergency.

(2) The
 period determined by the Superintendent shall not extend into the next fiscal year following the declaration of the state of emergency by the Governor, except upon a showing by a school district, county office of education, or charter school, to the satisfaction of the Superintendent, that extending the period into the next fiscal year is essential to alleviate continued reductions in average daily attendance attributable to the state of emergency.

(3) Notwithstanding any other law, the Superintendent shall extend through the 2018–19 fiscal year the period during which it is essential to alleviate continued reductions in average daily attendance attributable to a state of emergency declared by the Governor in October 2017, for a school district where no less than 5 percent of the residences within the school district or school district facilities were destroyed by the qualifying emergency.

(c) (1) The average daily attendance of the school district, county office of education, or charter school for the fiscal year shall be estimated by the Superintendent in a manner that credits to the school district, county office of education, or charter school for determining the apportionments to be made to the school district, county office of education, or charter school from the State School Fund approximately the total average daily attendance that would have been credited to the school district, county office of education, or charter school had the emergency not occurred or had the order not been issued.

(2) (A) From September 1, 2021, to June 30, 2022, inclusive, with the exception of a material loss of attendance for pupils who are individuals with exceptional needs, as that term is defined in Section 56026, whose individualized education program developed pursuant to Article 3
 (commencing with Section 56340) of Chapter 4 of Part 30 does not specifically provide for participation in independent study or pupils who are enrolled in community day schools pursuant to Article 3 (commencing with Section 48660) of Chapter 4 of Part 27, a school district, county office of education, or charter school shall not receive average daily attendance credit pursuant to this section for pupils that have been quarantined and are unable to attend in-person instruction due to exposure to, or infection with, COVID-19 pursuant to local or state public health guidance.

(B) Notwithstanding subparagraph (A), from September 1, 2021, to June 30, 2022, inclusive, a school district, county office of education, or charter school may receive average daily attendance credit pursuant to this section for school closures related to impacts from COVID-19 or material loss of attendance due to COVID-19 related staffing shortages if the following
 conditions are established to the satisfaction of the Superintendent by affidavits of the members of the governing board or body of the school district, county office of education, or charter school and the county superintendent of schools:

(i) The school district, county office of education, or charter school is unable to provide in person instruction to pupils due to staffing shortages as a result of staff quarantine due to exposure to, or infection with, COVID-19 pursuant to local or state public health guidance.

(ii) For certificated staff shortages, the school district, county office of education, or charter school has exhausted all options for obtaining staff coverage, including using all certificated staff and substitute teacher options, and has consulted with their county office of education and the Superintendent in determining that staffing needs cannot be met through
 any option.

(iii) For classified staff shortages, the school district, county office of education, or charter school has exhausted all options for obtaining staff coverage, including using all staff options, and has consulted with their county office of education and the Superintendent in determining that staffing needs cannot be met through any option.

(d) Notwithstanding any other law, for a school district or charter school physically located within a school district, where no less than 5 percent of the residences within the school district, or the school district’s facilities, were destroyed as a result of a state of emergency that was declared by the Governor in November 2018, all of the following shall apply:

(1) (A) In the 2020–21 fiscal year, for school districts, the Superintendent
 shall calculate the difference between the school district’s certified second principal apportionment local control funding formula entitlement pursuant to Section 42238.02 in the 2020–21 fiscal year and the 2019–20 fiscal year and, if there is a difference, allocate the amount of that difference to the school district.

(B) In the 2021–22 fiscal year, for school districts, the Superintendent shall allocate an amount equal to 25 percent of the difference calculated in subparagraph (A) to the school district.

(C) In the 2022–23 fiscal year, for school districts, the Superintendent shall allocate an amount equal to 12.5 percent of the difference calculated in subparagraph (A) to the school district.

(2) (A) In the 2019–20 and 2020–21 fiscal years, for charter schools, the Superintendent shall
 calculate the difference between the charter school’s certified second principal apportionment local control funding formula entitlement pursuant to Section 42238.02 in the current year and each respective prior year and, if there is a difference, allocate the amount of that difference to the charter school.

(B) In the 2021–22 fiscal year, for charter schools that operate a minimum of 175 schooldays and report at least 75 percent of the total second period average daily attendance for the 2019–20 fiscal year, as described in Section 41601, the Superintendent shall allocate 25 percent of the difference calculated in subparagraph (A) to the
 charter school.

(3) For a county office of education funded pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (g) of Section 2575 that has within the boundaries of the county school districts or charter schools affected pursuant to this subdivision and that has in the schools operated by the county office of education at least a 10-percent decrease in average daily attendance in the current fiscal year, in the 2019–20 and 2020–21 fiscal years, the Superintendent shall calculate the difference between the county office of education’s alternative education grant entitlement certified at the annual principal apportionment pursuant to Section 2574 in the current fiscal year and each respective prior fiscal year and, if there is a difference, allocate the amount of that difference to the county office of education.

(4) A school district may transfer funds received pursuant to paragraph (1) to
 the county office of education for the portion of the funds that represents pupils served by the county office of education who are funded through the school district’s local control funding formula apportionment pursuant to Section 2576.

(5) In each fiscal year, the allocations made pursuant to this subdivision shall be made to school districts and charter schools by the Superintendent as soon as practicable after the second principal apportionment and to county offices of education as soon as practicable after the annual principal apportionment. The allocations made shall be final. The Superintendent may provide a preliminary allocation of up to 50 percent no sooner than the first principal apportionment.

(6) (A) The amounts described in this
 subdivision shall be continuously appropriated from the General Fund to the Superintendent for these purposes.

(B) For purposes of making the computations required by Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution, the appropriation made by this subdivision shall be deemed to be “General Fund revenues appropriated for school districts,” as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 41202, for the fiscal year in which they are appropriated, and included within the “total allocations to school districts and community college districts from General Fund proceeds of taxes appropriated pursuant to Article XIIIB,” as defined in subdivision (e) of Section 41202.

(e) Notwithstanding any other law, for a school district or charter school physically located within a school district, where no less than 5 percent of the residences within the school district, or
 the school district’s facilities, were destroyed as a result of a state of emergency that was declared by the Governor in September 2020, all of the following shall apply:

(1) For the 2021–22 fiscal year, for school districts, the Superintendent shall calculate the difference between the school district’s certified annual principal apportionment local control funding formula revenues pursuant to Section 42238.02 in the 2021–22 fiscal year and the 2019–20 fiscal year, including local revenue, pursuant to subdivision (j) of Section 42238.02, and any additional funds received pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 42238.03 in excess of the entitlement calculated pursuant to Section 42238.02 and 42238.03 and, if there is a difference, allocate the amount of that difference to the school district.

(2) For the 2021–22 fiscal year, for charter schools that operate a minimum of 175
 schooldays and report at least 75 percent of the total second period average daily attendance for the 2019–20 fiscal year, as described in Section 41601, the Superintendent shall calculate the difference between the charter school’s certified second principal apportionment local control funding formula revenues pursuant to Section 42238.02 in the 2021–22 fiscal year and the 2019–20 fiscal year, and, if there is a difference, allocate the amount of that difference to the charter school.

(3) School districts and charter schools shall notify the Superintendent of their eligibility pursuant to this subdivision by November 1, 2021, in the manner prescribed by the Superintendent.

(4) Preliminary allocations made pursuant to paragraph (1) shall be made to school districts by the Superintendent through the principal apportionment beginning with
 the 2021–22 fiscal year first principal apportionment certification and shall be made final as of the annual principal apportionment.

(5) Allocations
 made
 pursuant to paragraph (2) shall be made to charter schools by the Superintendent as soon as practicable after the second principal apportionment and shall be made final as of the annual principal apportionment. The Superintendent may provide a preliminary allocation of up to 50 percent no sooner than the first principal apportionment.

(f) Notwithstanding any other law, for a school district where a school eligible for funding pursuant to Article 4 (commencing with Section 42280) of Chapter 7 of Part 24 of Division 3 was destroyed as a result of a state of emergency that was declared by the Governor in August 2021, the following shall apply:

(1) The school district may continue to report the amount of attendance generated by pupils enrolled in another school of the school district that would have otherwise attended the destroyed school, and the number of full-time
 teachers employed by the school district that would have otherwise provided instructional services at the school, as if the school were operational in the 2021–22, 2022–23, and 2023–24 fiscal years.

(2) The school shall be considered a necessary small school for the purpose of Section 42282 in the 2022–23 and 2023–24 fiscal years.

(g) (1) Notwithstanding any other law, paragraphs (2) and (3) shall apply for the following charter schools identified in subparagraph (A), (B), or (C) that were damaged, destroyed, or directly impacted, as a result of a state of emergency that was declared by the Governor in January 2025:

(A) Marquez Charter, Palisades Charter Elementary, and Palisades Charter High within the Los Angeles Unified School District.

(B) Aveson Global Leadership Academy, Aveson School of Leaders, Odyssey Charter, OCS - South, and Pasadena Rosebud Academy in the Pasadena Unified School District.

(C) Alma Fuerte Public in the City of Pasadena.

(2) For the 2025–26 fiscal year, for charter schools identified in paragraph (1) that operate a minimum of 175 schooldays, as described in Section 41601, the Superintendent shall calculate the difference between the charter school’s certified local control funding formula entitlement pursuant to Section 42238.02 as of the annual principal apportionment in the 2025–26 fiscal year and the first principal apportionment in the 2024–25 fiscal year, and, if there
 is a difference, allocate the amount of that difference to the charter school. The amount calculated shall be adjusted to account for the increase in the add-on amount for transitional kindergarten pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (g) of Section 42238.02 from the 2024–25 to 2025–26 fiscal years, inclusive, in a manner that ensures that the charter schools identified in paragraph (1) are not negatively impacted for the difference in the funding increase for transitional kindergarten.

(3) Allocations made pursuant to paragraph (2) shall be made final as of the annual principal apportionment. The Superintendent may provide a preliminary allocation no sooner than the first principal apportionment.

(h) (1) Notwithstanding any other law, for charter
 schools listed in paragraph (1) of subdivision (g), the Superintendent shall calculate 30 percent of the charter school’s local control funding formula entitlement pursuant to Section 42238.02 as of the 2024–25 first principal apportionment and allocate that amount for each charter school in the 2026–27 fiscal year.

(2) In the 2026–27 fiscal year, the Superintendent shall allocate four million dollars ($4,000,000) to Pasadena Unified School District to help address outstanding and ongoing recovery-related costs that resulted from the state of emergency that was declared by the Governor in January 2025.

(i) This section applies to any average daily attendance that occurs during any part of a school year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 773, Sec. 1.   (SB 959)   Effective September 29, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

46393.

(a) (1) The Legislature finds and declares that, given the effects of public health emergencies and the significant and growing number of natural disasters that the state has faced in recent years, there is an increased need for local educational agencies to provide instructional continuity for pupils when conditions make in-person instruction infeasible for all or some pupils, and that maintaining access to instruction during a natural disaster or emergency is crucial in mitigating the negative impacts of lost learning time and supporting pupil mental health.

(2) It is the intent of the Legislature that all local educational agencies have plans in place to keep pupils learning in the event of school closures or absences, especially by
 being prepared to shift to online or other remote learning options, if necessary. While the first priority will always be to get pupils back to in-person instruction as quickly as possible following a natural disaster or other emergency event, schools should have the infrastructure in place to move instruction online, or otherwise deliver curriculum remotely, and ensure that pupils can access that instruction at short notice. Best practices like including independent study program agreements in back-to-school paperwork provided pursuant to Section 48980 for parents to sign ahead of time, posting assignments and pupil academic resources online, assigning laptops to all pupils, developing emergency partnerships with neighboring local educational agencies, and maintaining an online instructional platform can help local educational agencies be better prepared to shift to remote learning options if the need arises.

(b) For affidavits submitted to
 the Superintendent for events occurring after September 1, 2021, but on or before June 30,
 2026, that resulted in a school closure or material decrease in attendance, a school district, county office of education, or charter school that provides an affidavit to the Superintendent, pursuant to Section 41422 or 46392, shall certify that it has a plan for which independent study will be offered to pupils, pursuant to Article 5.5 (commencing with Section 51745) of Chapter 5 of Part 28 of Division 4. The plan shall comply with all of the following:

(1) Independent study is offered to any pupil impacted by any of the conditions listed in Section 46392 within 10 instructional days of the first day of a school closure or material decrease in attendance. Pupils who are individuals with exceptional needs shall receive the services identified in their individualized education programs pursuant to paragraph (9) of subdivision (a) of Section 56345 and may participate in an independent study program.

(2) Require reopening for in-person instruction as soon as possible unless prohibited under the direction of the local or state health officer.

(3) Notwithstanding subdivision (c) of Section 51745 or subparagraph (F) of paragraph (9) of subdivision (g) of Section 51747, include information regarding establishing independent study master agreements in a reasonable amount of time.

(c) Notwithstanding subdivision (b), the plan is not required to comply with subdivision (d), (e), or (f) of Section 51747 for school closures or a material decrease in attendance for 15 days or less for affected pupils.

(d) A copy of the plan and, if applicable, the state or local public health or public safety order that required school closure shall accompany the affidavit
 provided to the Superintendent described in subdivision (b).

(e) (1) For affidavits submitted to the Superintendent for events occurring on or after July 1, 2026, that result in a school closure or material decrease in attendance, a school district, county office of education, or charter school that provides an affidavit to the Superintendent, pursuant to Section 41422 or 46392, shall certify all of the following:

(A) It has a local governing board- or body-adopted comprehensive school safety plan in place meeting the requirements of Section 32282, including the requirements of paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 32282.

(B) Either of the following:

(i) It has offered pupil engagement and instruction consistent with paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 32282.

(ii) Due to extenuating circumstances, it has not provided pupil engagement and instruction consistent with paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 32282. A school district, county office of education, or charter school that certifies pursuant to this clause shall describe the circumstances that prevented it from providing pupil engagement and instruction and shall describe what pupil engagement, services, and instruction it did provide to support its pupils during or immediately after the period of closure or material decrease in attendance.

(2) If applicable, a copy of the state or local public health or
 public safety order that required school closure shall accompany the affidavit provided to the Superintendent described in paragraph (1).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 998, Sec. 15.   (AB 176)   Effective September 30, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. Interdistrict Attendance Computation [46600. - 46610.]

46600.

(a) (1) The governing boards of two or more school districts may enter into an agreement, for a term not to exceed five school years, for the interdistrict attendance of pupils who are residents of the school districts. The agreement may provide for the admission to a school district other than the school district of residence of a pupil who requests a permit to attend a school district of proposed enrollment that is a party to the agreement and that maintains schools and classes in transitional kindergarten, kindergarten, or any of grades 1 to 12, inclusive, to which the pupil requests admission. Once a pupil in transitional kindergarten, kindergarten, or any of grades 1 to 12, inclusive, is enrolled in a school pursuant to this chapter, the pupil shall not have to reapply for an interdistrict transfer, and
 the governing board of the school district of enrollment shall allow the pupil to continue to attend the school in which the pupil is enrolled, except as specified in paragraphs (2) and (4).

(2) The agreement shall stipulate the terms and conditions under which interdistrict attendance shall be permitted or denied. The agreement may contain standards for reapplication agreed to by the school district of residence and the school district of enrollment that differ from the requirements prescribed by paragraph (1). The agreement may stipulate terms and conditions established by the school district of residence and the school district of enrollment under which the permit may be revoked.

(3) The designee of the superintendent of the school district of residence shall issue an individual permit verifying the school district’s approval, pursuant to policies of the governing board of the
 school district and terms of the agreement for the transfer. A permit shall be valid upon concurring endorsement by the designee of the governing board of the school district of proposed enrollment. The stipulation of the terms and conditions under which the permit may be revoked is the responsibility of the school district of enrollment.

(4) Notwithstanding paragraph (2), a school district of residence or school district of enrollment shall not rescind existing transfer permits for pupils after June 30 following the completion of grade 10, or for pupils in grade 11 or 12.

(b) A pupil who has been determined by personnel of either the school district of residence or the school district of proposed enrollment to have been the victim of an act of bullying, as defined in subdivision (r) of Section 48900, committed by a pupil of the school district of residence shall, at the request
 of the parent, be given priority for interdistrict attendance.

(c) In addition to the requirements of subdivision (e) of Section 48915.1, and regardless of whether an agreement exists or a permit is issued pursuant to this section, any school district may admit a pupil expelled from another school district in which the pupil continues to reside.

(d) (1) Notwithstanding any other law, and regardless of whether an agreement exists or a permit is issued pursuant to this section, a school district of residence shall not prohibit the transfer of a pupil who is a child of an active duty military parent to a school district of proposed enrollment if the school district of proposed enrollment approves the application for transfer.

(2) A school district of residence shall approve an intradistrict
 transfer request for a victim of an act of bullying unless the requested school is at maximum capacity, in which case the school district shall accept an intradistrict transfer request for a different school in the school district. Notwithstanding any other law, and regardless of whether an agreement exists or a permit is issued pursuant to this section, if the school district of residence has only one school offering the grade level of the victim of an act of bullying and therefore there is no option for an intradistrict transfer, the victim of an act of bullying may apply for an interdistrict transfer and the school district of residence shall not prohibit the transfer if the school district of proposed enrollment approves the application for transfer.

(3) A school district of proposed enrollment that elects to accept an interdistrict transfer pursuant to this subdivision shall accept all pupils who apply to transfer under this subdivision
 until the school district is at maximum capacity. A school district of proposed enrollment shall ensure that pupils admitted under this subdivision are selected through an unbiased process that prohibits an inquiry into or evaluation or consideration of whether or not a pupil should be enrolled based on academic or athletic performance, physical condition, proficiency in English, family income, or any of the individual characteristics set forth in Section 220, including, but not limited to, race or ethnicity, gender, gender identity, gender expression, and immigration status.

(4) (A) For purposes of this subdivision, “active military duty parent” means a parent with full-time military duty status in the active uniformed service of the United States, including members of the National Guard and the
 State Guard on active duty orders pursuant to Chapter 1209 (commencing with Section 12301) and Chapter 1211 (commencing with Section 12401) of Part II of Subtitle E of Title 10 of the United States Code.

(B) For purposes of this subdivision, a “victim of an act of bullying” means a pupil that has been determined to have been a victim of bullying by an investigation pursuant to the complaint process described in Section 234.1 and the bullying was committed by any pupil in the school district of residence, and the parent of the pupil has filed a written complaint regarding the bullying with the school, school district personnel, or a local law enforcement agency.

(5) (A) Upon request of the parent or guardian on behalf of a pupil eligible for transfer pursuant to this subdivision, a school district of enrollment shall
 provide transportation assistance to a pupil who is eligible for free or reduced-price meals.

(B) A school district of enrollment may provide transportation assistance to any pupil admitted under this subdivision.

(C) It is the intent of the Legislature that the amount of transportation assistance provided to a pupil pursuant to subparagraph (A) or (B) not exceed the supplemental grant received, if any, for the pupil pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 42238.02.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 97, Sec. 1.   (AB 2193)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

46600.1.

For purposes of this chapter, the following terms have the following meanings:

(a) “Class 1 county” and “class 2 county” have the same meanings as defined in subdivision (e) of Section 48919.5.

(b) “County board of education” means the county board that has jurisdiction over the school district denying the permit.

(c) “Current year request” means a request for interdistrict transfer received beginning 15 calendar days before the commencement of instruction in the school year for which interdistrict transfer is sought.

(d) (1) For purposes of appealing to the county board of education, a “denial” includes a school district’s failure to provide written notification of the school district’s decision within the timelines prescribed in this chapter.

(2) A “denial” shall not include any of the following:

(A) A request that has been deemed abandoned, as described in paragraph (4) of subdivision (a) of Section 46600.2.

(B) An existing interdistrict transfer permit that has been revoked or rescinded in accordance with the policy of the governing board of the school district.

(C) A denial by the school district of proposed enrollment when no permit has
 been first issued by the school district of residence.

(e) “Future year request” means a request for interdistrict transfer received up until 15 calendar days before the commencement of instruction in the school year for which interdistrict transfer is sought.

(f) “Parent” means the natural or adoptive parent or guardian, the person having legal custody, or other educational rights holder.

(g) “School district of proposed enrollment” means a school
 district other than the school district in which the parent of a pupil resides, but in which the parent of the pupil nevertheless intends to enroll the pupil pursuant to this chapter.

(h) “School district of residence” means a school district in which the parent of a pupil resides and in which the pupil would otherwise be required to enroll pursuant to the compulsory education requirements as specified in Section 48200.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 550, Sec. 2.   (AB 2826)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

46600.2.

(a) Each school district of residence and school district of proposed enrollment shall post on its Internet Web site the procedures and timelines, including a link to the policy of the governing board of the school district, regarding a request for an interdistrict transfer permit in a manner that is accessible to the public without a password. The information posted on the Internet Web site shall include, but need not be limited to, all of the following:
